Georgia statutes. TITLE 28 General Assembly
PART 1 General Provisions

28-5-60.
Creation; membership; representation of members by deputies or other designated employees.

There is created the Claims Advisory Board, hereinafter called the board, to be composed of the Secretary of State, who shall be the chairman, the commissioner of human services, the commissioner of corrections, and the commissioner of transportation. Whenever the board takes any official action authorized under the law or duly promulgated rules and regulations, three of the members shall constitute a quorum; however, any of those individuals named above may be represented by a deputy or other designated employee; and any such action shall be valid if any two of the remaining three individuals are present during such action.

The Claims Advisory Board is assigned to the Secretary of State for administrative purposes only as prescribed in Code Section 50-4-3.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 624, § 1; Ga. L. 1972, p. 1015, § 1805; Ga. L. 1979, p. 797, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-4/HB 228.

Cross references.

Insuring and indemnification of public officers and employees generally, § 45-9-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

For article discussing sovereign immunity and the state court of claims, see 14 Ga. St. B.J. 152 (1978).

For article, “Tort Claims Against the State: Georgia’s Compensation System,” see 32 Ga. L. Rev. 1103 (1998).

28-5-60.1.
“The state or any of its departments or agencies” defined.

As used in this article, the term “the state or any of its departments or agencies” includes any department, agency, bureau, or commission of state government but does not include state authorities or any county or municipal department, agency, bureau, commission, or authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

28-5-60.1

, as enacted by Ga. L. 1985, p. 900, § 1.

28-5-61.
Employment of secretarial, investigatorial, and other help.

The chairman of the board is authorized to provide secretarial and other help necessary to administer this article and is also authorized to employ independent investigators if deemed necessary or advisable to assist the board. Such help and investigators shall be paid from funds appropriated to the office of the Secretary of State for this specific purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 624, § 6.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For note discussing some limitations on governmental tort immunity, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 494 (1969).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).

28-5-62.
Unlawful compensation.

It shall be unlawful for any member of the Claims Advisory Board, any member of the General Assembly, or any state official or employee to receive any fee, money, gift, or any other thing of value, other than the regular compensation and allowances which he receives from state funds, in connection with any claim presented to the Claims Advisory Board.

Any person who violates any provision of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 655, § 1.

28-5-63.
Statement attached to checks issued for payment of claims.

The check issued to any person, firm, association, or corporation as payment for any claim pursuant to this article shall have attached thereto the following statement:

“It shall be unlawful for any member of the Claims Advisory Board, any member of the General Assembly, or any state official or employee to receive any fee, money, gift, or any other thing of value, other than the regular compensation and allowances which he receives from state funds, in connection with any claim presented to the Claims Advisory Board.”

History.

Ga. L. 1965, p. 655, § 2.

Law reviews.

For note, “An Alternative to the Georgia Claims Advisory Board: State Tort Liability,” see 2 Ga. L. Rev. 275 (1968).

For note discussing some limitations on governmental tort immunity, see 5 Ga. St. B.J. 494 (1969).

For article, “Personal Liability of State Officials Under State and Federal Law,” see 9 Ga. L. Rev. 821 (1975).